Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Skier Safety

§ 6-9-301.
Skier safety; skiing while impaired; unsafe skiing; collisions; penalties.

No person shall move uphill on any passenger tramway or use any ski slope or trail while such person’s ability to do so is impaired by the consumption of alcohol or by the use of any illicit controlled substance or other drug as defined by W.S.

35-7-1002

.

No person shall ski in reckless disregard of his safety or the safety of others.

No skier involved in a collision with another person in which an injury results shall leave the vicinity of the collision before giving his name and current address to an employee of the ski area operator or a member of the ski patrol except for the purpose of securing aid for a person injured in the collision, in which event the person leaving the scene of the collision shall give his name and current address as required by this subsection within twenty-four (24) hours after securing aid.

Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than twenty (20) days, a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 202, § 2.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Recreational Injuries and Inherent Risks: Wyoming's Recreation Safety Act: An Update,” see XXXIII Land & Water L. Rev. 249 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Products liability: skiing equipment, 76 ALR4th 256.

Skier's liability for injuries to or death of another person, 75 ALR5th 583.